Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.110

Moving expenses of employees.

Whenever it is reasonably necessary to the successful performance of the required duty of a state office, commission, department or institution to transfer a deputy or other employee from one station to another within the state, thereby necessitating a change of such deputy's or employee's domicile, it shall be lawful for such office, commission, department or institution to move such deputy's or employee's household goods and effects to the new station at the expense of the state, or to defray the actual cost of such removal by common carrier, or otherwise, at the expense of the state, in which latter event reimbursement to the deputy or employee shall be upon voucher submitted by him or her and approved by the department head.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5008; 1967 ex.s. c 16 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.03.110. Prior: 1943 c 128 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9948-1.]